Indiana, session 2026, HB1370.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-1-37.5-24, AS ADDED BY P.L.144-2025,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) A utilization review entity shall allow a
covered individual and a covered individual's health care provider at
least twenty-four (24) hours (excluding weekends and state and federal
legal holidays) after an emergency admission or provision of
emergency health care services for the covered individual or health
care provider to notify the utilization review entity of the emergency
admission or provision of the emergency health care service.
(b) A utilization review entity shall cover emergency health care
services necessary to screen and stabilize a covered individual. If a
health care provider certifies in writing to a utilization review entity not
later than seventy-two (72) hours (excluding weekends and state and
federal legal holidays) after a covered individual's emergency
admission that the covered individual's condition required the
2026 IN 1370—LS 6831/DI 154


emergency health care service, the certification will create a
presumption that the emergency health care service was medically
necessary. The presumption may be rebutted only if the utilization
review entity can establish, with clear and convincing evidence, that
the emergency health care service was not medically necessary.
(c) A utilization review entity shall not require prior
authorization for ambulance services provided:
(1) to a covered individual;
(2) by a nonparticipating (as defined in IC 27-1-2.3-6(1))
ambulance service provider (as defined in IC 27-1-2.3-2); and
(3) within twelve (12) hours after the ambulance services are
requested.
(c) (d) The medical necessity of an emergency health care service
may not be based on whether the service was provided by a
participating or nonparticipating provider. Any restriction on the
coverage of an emergency health care service provided by a
nonparticipating provider may not be greater than the restriction that
applies when the service is provided by a participating provider.
SECTION 2. IC 27-1-37.5-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) As used in this section,
"emergent response services" means any medical assessment,
treatment, or transportation to or from a hospital (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-179(a)), a health facility (as defined in IC 16-18-2-167),
or between hospitals (as defined in IC 16-18-2-179(a)) or health
facilities (as defined in IC 16-18-2-167), provided by emergency
medical services personnel in immediate response to a condition or
incident that requires immediate attention to prevent serious harm
to a covered individual.
(b) As used in this section, "urgent response services" means
any medical assessment, treatment, or transportation to or from a
hospital (as defined in IC 16-18-2-179(a)), a health facility (as
defined in IC 16-18-2-167), or between hospitals (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-179(a)) or health facilities (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-167), provided by emergency medical services
personnel that is necessary to protect the covered individual's
health, ensure timely access to care, or prevent treatment delays,
including transports from hospitals, nursing homes, assisted living
facilities, or between health care facilities.
(c) A utilization review entity shall not require prior
authorization for emergent response services or urgent response
services that are provided:
2026 IN 1370—LS 6831/DI 154


(1) to a covered individual;
(2) in good faith; and
(3) within twenty-four (24) hours after the emergent response
services or urgent response services are requested.
SECTION 3. IC 27-8-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2025,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this section, "emergency medical
services" has the meaning set forth in IC 16-18-2-110.
(b) As used in this section, "emergency medical services provider
organization" means a provider of emergency medical services that is
certified by the Indiana emergency medical services commission as an
advanced life support provider organization under rules adopted under
IC 16-31-3.
(c) As used in this section, "policy of accident and sickness
insurance" has the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-5-1. However, for
purposes of this section, the term does not include the following:
(1) Accident only, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement,
long term care, or disability income insurance.
(2) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance.
(3) Automobile medical payment insurance.
(4) A specified disease policy.
(5) A policy that provides a stipulated daily, weekly, or monthly
payment to an insured without regard to the actual expense of the
confinement.
(6) A short term insurance plan (as defined in IC 27-8-5.9-3).
(d) A policy of accident and sickness insurance that provides
coverage for emergency medical services must provide reimbursement
for emergency medical services that are:
(1) rendered by an emergency medical services provider
organization;
(2) within the emergency medical services provider organization's
scope of practice; and
(3) performed or provided as advanced life support services; and
(4) (3) performed or provided:
(A) during a response initiated through the 911 system or an
equivalent telephone number, a texting system, or any
other method of summoning emergency medical services;
or
(B) as part of a mobile integrated healthcare program
described in IC 16-31-12; or
(C) when an individual is determined to require emergency
medical services by a physician licensed under IC 25-22.5;
2026 IN 1370—LS 6831/DI 154


regardless of whether the patient is transported.
(e) Reimbursement for basic and advanced life support services
through a policy to which this section applies must be provided on an
equal basis regardless of whether the services involve transportation of
the patient by ambulance.
(f) If multiple emergency medical services provider organizations
qualify and submit a claim for reimbursement under this section for an
encounter, the insurer:
(1) may reimburse under this section only for one (1) claim per
patient encounter; and
(2) shall reimburse the claim submitted by the emergency medical
services provider organization that performed or provided the
majority of advanced life support services for the patient.
(g) The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
(h) This section does not require a policy of accident and sickness
insurance to provide coverage for emergency medical services.
SECTION 4. IC 27-13-7-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2025,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) This section applies to each of the
following:
(1) An individual contract.
(2) A group contract.
(b) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-18-2-110.
(c) As used in this section, "emergency medical services provider
organization" means a provider of emergency medical services that is
certified by the Indiana emergency medical services commission as an
advanced life support provider organization under rules adopted under
IC 16-31-3.
(d) An individual contract and a group contract that provide
coverage for emergency medical services must provide reimbursement
for emergency medical services that are:
(1) rendered by an emergency medical services provider
organization;
(2) within the emergency medical services provider organization's
scope of practice;
(3) performed or provided as advanced life support services; and
(4) (3) performed or provided:
(A) during a response initiated through the 911 system or an
equivalent telephone number, a texting system, or any
other method of summoning emergency medical services;
2026 IN 1370—LS 6831/DI 154


or
(B) as part of a mobile integrated healthcare program
described in IC 16-31-12; or
(C) when an individual is determined to require emergency
medical services by a physician licensed under IC 25-22.5;
regardless of whether the patient is transported.
(e) Reimbursement for basic and advanced life support services
through a contract to which this section applies must be provided on an
equal basis regardless of whether the services involve transportation of
the patient by ambulance.
(f) If multiple emergency medical services provider organizations
qualify and submit a claim for reimbursement under this section, the
health maintenance organization:
(1) may reimburse under this section only for one (1) claim per
patient encounter; and
(2) shall reimburse the claim submitted by the emergency medical
services provider organization that performed or provided the
majority of advanced life support services.
(g) The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
(h) This section does not require an individual contract or a group
contract to provide coverage for emergency medical services.
2026 IN 1370—LS 6831/DI 154